src/fst/incoming/kawe-habitual-suf-rules.script
# rules for finalizing habitual aspect endings

#these definitions must be the same as defined in the root lexicon in kawe-root.lexc

define habS %^HAB%-S%^; # intermediate realization of 's' habitual suffix
define habA %^HAB%-A%^; # intermediate realization of the habitual suffix 'a'

define habOS habS -> s;
define habOA habA -> a;


define removeHabOS habS -> 0;
define removeHabOA hab0A -> 0;


define reWriteHabitual habOS .o. habOA .o. removeHabOS .o. removeHabOA;

push reWriteHabitual
